North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-10 Confession of Judgment [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 68]

28-10-01.
Judgment by confession. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 68.

28-10-02.
Verified statement — Contents. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 68.

28-10-03.
Procedure in court — Execution. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 68.